Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.480

Liability of members of state hazardous materials planning committee and local emergency planning committees.

Any person who is appointed by the state emergency response commission under the authority of Sec. 301(c) of Title III of the Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11001) to serve on the state hazardous materials planning committee or a local emergency planning committee who, in good faith, assists in the development or review of local plans to respond to hazardous materials incidents is not liable for civil damages as a result of any act or omission in the development, review, or implementation of such plans unless the act or omission constitutes gross negligence or wilful misconduct.

[ 1988 c 42 s 15.]

NOTES:

Severability—1988 c 42: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1988 c 42 s 19.]